Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-829
Bridges in or near two or more counties; joint contracts; enforcement; procedure.

If the county board of either of such counties, after reasonable notice in writing from the county board of any other such county, shall neglect or refuse to build or repair any such bridge, when any contract or agreement has been made in regard to the same, it shall be lawful for the board so giving notice to build or repair the same, and to recover, by suit, one-half, or such amount as shall have been agreed upon, of the expense of so building or repairing such bridge, with cost of suit and interest from the time of the completion thereof, from the county so neglecting or refusing.

Laws 1879, § 89, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 2990;

C.S.1922, § 2741;

C.S.1929, § 39-827;

R.S.1943, § 39-829.

In order to recover part of cost of bridge over a stream that forms boundary between counties, notice must be given of intention to construct. Buffalo County v. Phelps County, 129 Neb. 268, 261 N.W. 360 (1935).